Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-962
Violations; penalty.

Any person who willfully (1) files or causes to be filed a certificate or petition under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act, knowing any of the allegations thereof to be false, (2) deprives a subject of any of the rights granted the subject by either act or section 83-390, or (3) breaches the confidentiality of records required by section 71-961 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor in addition to any civil liability which he or she may incur for such actions.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 79;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 63;

Laws 2000, LB 884, § 22;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 83-1069;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 82;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 53.

Sex Offender Commitment Act, see section 71-1201.

The Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act provides for a criminal penalty for any person who willfully breaches the confidentiality of records as required by section 83-1068, in addition to any civil liability which may be incurred by such acts. In re Interest of Michael M., 6 Neb. App. 560, 574 N.W.2d 774 (1998).